California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(a) Sixty-five percent of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting sold or acquired a majority of the total volume of timber in the preceding marketing year by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting sold or acquired 65 percent or more of the total volume of timber in the preceding marketing year by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77603.

The secretary shall establish a period, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days, to conduct the referendum and may prescribe additional procedures that may be necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period, except that the total referendum period shall not exceed 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 130.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77604.

The nonreceipt of a ballot by any producer shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77605.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in Section 77602, the secretary shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all affected producers whose names and addresses are on file with the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 131.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77606.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in Section 77602, the secretary shall certify and declare this chapter inoperative. The secretary may conduct another implementation referendum vote one year or more after the previous referendum has been held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 132.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77607.

Upon certification of the commission, the secretary shall contact all producers by mail or call meetings of producers for the purpose of nominating and electing persons to the commission. All producers on the secretary’s list shall be provided written notice of any election meetings at least 10 days prior to the meeting date.

To be eligible for election to the commission, nominees shall present to the secretary a nomination petition with the signatures of at least three eligible producers from the category of producers specified in Section 77541 from which the nominee is seeking election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 133.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77608.

Subsequent to the first election of members and alternate members of the commission pursuant to this chapter, persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to nomination and election procedures established by the commission with the approval of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 134.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77608.5.

Subsequent to the initial implementation referendum vote and the first election of commissioners, the commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of providing persons subject to this chapter with access to producers on the commission’s list of producers for purposes related to an election or referendum or an act or determination of the commission. Access to producers shall not include actual release or disclosure of the commission’s confidential list of producers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 135.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77609.

(a) Prior to the referendum vote conducted by the secretary pursuant to Section 77602, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary deems necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary list and information and conducting the vote.

(b) Any funds which are not used to carry out Section 77602 shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) Upon the establishment of the commission, the commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out Section 77602 and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 136.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [77621. - 77627.]

77621.

(a) The commission shall establish the assessment for the marketing year not later than January 1 of each year or as soon thereafter as is possible.

(b) The assessment shall not exceed one dollar ($1) per thousand board feet net log scale Scribner Decimal C log rule, or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the commission.

(c) The producer shall pay the assessment to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(d) An assessment of more than the amount provided for in subdivision (b) may not be charged unless and until a greater assessment is approved pursuant to the vote requirements specified in Section 77602.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77622.

Any person requesting an exemption from this chapter shall file an affidavit with the commission attesting that he or she is not a producer. The affidavit shall contain all of the information required by the commission. The commission shall review the affidavit, conduct any additional investigation it deems appropriate, and approve or deny the affidavit. Approval of the affidavit does not exempt the person from the requirements of Section 77623.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 868, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77623.

Every producer and every person described in subdivision (c) of Section 77528 shall keep a complete and accurate record of all transactions involving the sale or purchase of timber. The records shall be in simple form and contain information as the commission shall prescribe. The records shall be retained by the producer or person for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1127, Sec. 6.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77624.

(a) All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the secretary from producers is confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter.

(b) Information on volume shipments, product value, and any other related information that is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports to the commission or aggregate sales and inventory information, and any other information that the commission requires that gives only totals, but excludes individual producer information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(c) The commission may request that the Governor, by general or special order, authorize examination by the State Board of Equalization of records maintained by the commission, if a reciprocal arrangement exists between the commission and the State Board of Equalization. The information so obtained pursuant to the order of the Governor shall not be made public except to the extent and in the manner that the order authorizes that it be made public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 137.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77625.

Any assessment which is levied pursuant to this chapter is a personal debt of every producer so assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77626.

Any producer who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, pay 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77627.

When the producer is a corporation, all of the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for violating this chapter, including but not limited to, failing to pay assessments or to collect assessments, shall also include identical liability upon each director or officer of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [77641. - 77644.]

77641.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Refuse to render a report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) Furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission. 

(c) Fail or refuse to furnish the commission, or its duly authorized agents, information concerning the names and addresses of persons from whom timber has been received and the quantity so received.

(d) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77642.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of granting individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission, or before a committee of the commission designated for this purpose. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77643.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties and for the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance regarding this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. The commission shall not be required to post a bond as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief.

(b) A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified in Section 485.010 of that code is not required. Injunctive relief shall be granted pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or inadequate remedy at law specified in Sections 526 and 527 of that code is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding timber until there is full compliance and satisfaction of the judgment. Upon a favorable judgment for the commission, it is entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77644.

The repeal or suspension and termination of this chapter shall not do any of the following:

(a) Affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability which has arisen or which may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter.

(b) Release or extinguish any violation of this chapter.

(c) Affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [77661. - 77666.]

77661.

Beginning in 2001, and every ten years thereafter, the secretary shall hold a hearing to determine whether operation of this chapter should be continued. If the secretary finds after the hearing that a substantial question exists among the producers assessed under this chapter regarding whether operation of this chapter should be continued, the secretary shall submit the chapter for approval utilizing the voting procedures provided in Sections 77602 to 77604, inclusive.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given, the secretary shall so certify and this chapter shall remain in operation. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given, the secretary shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter suspended upon expiration of the then current marketing season.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 140.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77662.

If a referendum is conducted as the result of a petition pursuant to Section 77663, the hearing pursuant to Section 77661 shall be conducted every 10th year following the industry petitioned referendum.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 142.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77663.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that the operation of this chapter be suspended. However, any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing year.

(b) The secretary shall, upon receipt of the recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition filed with the secretary requesting a suspension signed by not less than 20 percent of the producers who sold or acquired not less than 20 percent of the total volume of timber in the immediately preceding marketing year, hold a referendum among the producers to determine if the operations of the commission shall be suspended. However, the secretary shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition, unless the petitioner shows, by a preponderance of the evidence, in a manner prescribed by the secretary, that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes.

(c) The secretary shall establish a referendum period, that shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. If at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary participate in the referendum, the secretary shall suspend the operation of this chapter if the secretary finds either one of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting sold or acquired a majority of the total volume of timber in the preceding marketing year by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting sold or acquired 65 percent or more of the total volume of timber in the preceding marketing year by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 143.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77664.

(a) The secretary shall terminate the commission at the end of the then current marketing year if the secretary finds that the termination of the commission is requested in writing, within a 90-day period, by at least 51 percent of the eligible producers that sold or acquired at least 51 percent of the total volume of timber.

(b) The producer originating the request shall file a written notice with the secretary in a manner that establishes the date the request is initiated. Any person may withdraw his or her name from the petition requesting the termination prior to the time the request is presented to the secretary.

(c) The signatures to the petition requesting the termination need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each producer signing the petition shall specify his or her place of business in a manner that will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

(d) The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention to terminate the commission. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 144.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77665.

After the effective date of suspension, the operation of the commission shall be concluded and the funds remaining held by the commission and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all producers from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing year. However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the prorate refund to these producers, the remaining funds shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid to an appropriate program conducted by the University of California or the California State University, another state agency, or a federal agency which deals with the purposes of this chapter. If no such program exists, the funds shall be paid to the State Treasury as unclaimed trust funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77666.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all persons affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19. California Date Commission [77701. - 77885.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [77701. - 77710.]

77701.

The inability of the date industry to maintain or expand present markets for dates may result in unnecessary economic waste.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77702.

The production and marketing of dates constitutes an important industry that provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its citizens.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 4.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77703.

The maintenance of the date industry in California is necessary to assure the public of a continuous supply of this vital product and the maintenance of needed levels of income for those engaged in the marketing of dates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 6.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77704.

Opportunity exists for continued growth and expansion of the industry by creating new markets in major portions of this country and abroad. The success of the expansion program is uniquely dependent upon effective advertising, promotion, and research since the creation of new markets is essentially a matter of educating and informing people of the use, nutritional value, and availability of the commodity. The expansion of the date industry also provides an important source of jobs for many people in this state, and serves to ensure the preservation of an agrarian society.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 8.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77705.

The successes that the date industry has enjoyed have come in part through a commitment to industry funded research that has led to significant improvements in the quality and variety of the dates available to consumers. It has also led to dates being a better consumer value. The establishment of the commission will continue and enhance this research effort and move the date industry toward its potential, resulting in increased consumer value and enhanced grower returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 9.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77706.

The production and marketing of dates in this state is hereby declared to be affected with the public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purposes of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 10.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77707.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that commission members and alternates are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular industry concerned and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the commission, the particular industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 11.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77708.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 12.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77709.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is uniquely situated to provide those engaged in the marketing of dates the opportunity to avail themselves of the benefits of collective action in the broad fields of development, maintenance, and expansion of markets; advertising and promotion; and research necessary to achieve the purposes stated herein.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 77703 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 5.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77710.

No action taken by the commission, or by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter, is a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 77704 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 7.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [77721. - 77736.]

77721.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1089, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

77722.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1089, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

77723.

“Commission” means the California Date Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 13.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77724.

“Commissioner” means any member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1089, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

77725.

“Date” means any variety of date produced in California, whether handled in whole or processed form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 14.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77726.

“Department” means the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 16.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77727.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 77726 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 15.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77727.5.

“Handle” means to engage in the business of a handler.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 18.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77728.

“Handler” means any person engaged in processing and marketing dates that the person has produced, purchased, or acquired from a producer, or is marketing on behalf of a producer, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, processor, or otherwise. “Handler” also includes a producer who sells, consigns, or otherwise transfers dates to a handler who is not subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 77727 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 17.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77729.

“Market” or “marketing” means to sell, consign, or otherwise distribute dates into commercial channels of trade resulting in the sale of dates. Dates shall also be considered “marketed” when inspected and certified by any third party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 20.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77730.

“Marketing research” means any research relating to the sale of dates.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 23.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77731.

“Marketing year” or “marketing season” means the period from October 1 of any year to September 30, inclusive, of the following year. The marketing year may be changed by a vote of 23 of the membership of the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 77728 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 19.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77732.

“Process” and “processing” are synonymous and mean the operations of receiving, cleaning, grading, freezing, drying, preserving, chopping, mashing, pitting, slicing, concentrating, macerating, extruding, or otherwise preparing dates for market in any form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 24.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77733.

“Producer” means any person in this state who grows dates of any variety, and who, upon request, provides proof of commodity sale.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 77729 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 21.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77734.

“Product research” means any research related to the development of new uses for dates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 25.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77735.

“Production research” means any research related to the production, harvest, or post-harvest handling of dates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 26.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77736.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 27.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Date Commission [77751. - 77767.]

77751.

(a) There is in state government the California Date Commission. Except as otherwise provided in Section 77752.5, the commission is composed of six date handlers from District 1 and may include one public member.

(b) The public member shall be appointed to the commission by the secretary from nominees recommended by the other members of the commission.

(c) The secretary, and other appropriate individuals, as determined by the commission, shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 29.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77752.

District 1 consists of all of Riverside County. Additional districts may be added pursuant to Section 77752.5, and shall be numbered consecutively beginning with “District 2,” as each new district becomes subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 30.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77752.5.

(a) Handlers of dates who are not subject to this chapter on the date it becomes operative pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 77811) may petition the commission to establish an additional district or districts composed of one or more counties that are not in District 1. If the petition is approved by a 23 vote of the membership of the commission, the secretary shall conduct an implementation vote of the handlers from those districts in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 77811).

(b) If the secretary certifies a favorable vote, all handlers from those districts shall be subject to this chapter. Thereafter, in accordance with procedures established by the commission, the number of handlers serving on the commission from each district shall be modified, if necessary, to ensure proper representation of each district. The commission shall not be composed of more than nine handlers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 31.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77753.

(a) The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease these activities or functions or to make corrections required by the secretary, the secretary, upon written notice, may suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of the activities or functions, as required by the secretary, has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Any action of the commission in violation of the written notice is without legal force or effect. The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions that are the subject of the written notice.

(d) The secretary shall include in the written notice to the commission the specific acts that the secretary determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, the secretary’s reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and the secretary’s recommendations with respect to any action that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 32.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77754.

The commission or the secretary may bring an action for judicial relief from the secretary’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, as the case may be, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other appropriate relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 33.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77755.

When the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the commission, the secretary shall concur, refuse to concur, or request additional information from the commission within 15 working days from the date the secretary receives notification of the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 34.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77756.

The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. However, a court, if it finds that the secretary acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, may relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the secretary’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 35.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77757.

An alternate member to each member of the commission, except the ex officio members, shall be elected or appointed in the same manner and for the same term as the member. An alternate member, in the absence of the member for whom he or she is an alternate, shall serve in place of the member and shall exercise all of the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In addition, if a member and his or her alternate are absent, any other alternate from the same district may serve in place of the member, and shall exercise all of the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. If the status of a member changes, thereby making the member ineligible to serve, or in the event of the death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, the alternate member shall act as a member of the commission until a qualified successor is elected or appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 36.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77758.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to or serving on the commission as a member or alternate member to continue in his or her position due to a change in his or her status, thereby making the person ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, resignation, or disqualification, shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by a majority vote of the remaining members of the commission. The appointee shall meet all of the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member or alternate whose office he or she is to occupy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 37.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77759.

(a) Any member and alternate on the commission shall be an individual, partner, or employee representing a handler who has a financial interest in handling dates for market. The qualifications of a member and alternate shall be maintained during the entire term of office.

(b) Not more than one member and one alternate shall be a person employed by, or connected in a proprietary capacity with, the same corporation, firm, partnership, association, or business organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 38.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77760.

The public member and his or her alternate member on the commission shall have all of the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member or alternate member, respectively, on the commission. The public member and his or her alternate member shall not have any financial interest in the date industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1089, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

77761.

The term of office of all members and alternate members of the commission, except any ex officio member, shall be three years from the date of their election and until qualified successors are elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

77762.

The commission is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It may sue and be sued, enter into contracts, adopt a seal, and has all of the powers of a corporation. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1089, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

77763.

A quorum of the commission is a majority of the voting members of the commission. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of Section 77841 and Sections 77731 and 77883, the vote of the majority of the members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum constitutes the act of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 40.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77764.

The secretary or his or her representative shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission and any committee meeting of the commission. However, the secretary or his or her representative is not entitled to attend an executive session of the commission or a committee of the commission called for the purpose of discussing potential or actual litigation against the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 41.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77765.

No member of the commission, or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, shall receive any compensation. Each member of the commission or each alternate member serving in place of a member, except ex officio members, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, may receive per diem of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission, and may also receive necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances as approved by the commission. If per diem is paid, it shall be paid to members for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 130, Sec. 42.   Effective July 18, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77766.
